test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-olema_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - olema: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm
     # according to Eesti keele käsiraamat
     # http://www.eki.ee/books/ekk09/
     # -----------------------------------------
     # indicative mood
     # present tense
     #
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+sg+ps+af: olen
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+sg+ps+af: oled
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps3+sg+ps+af: 'on'
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+pl+ps+af: oleme
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+pl+ps+af: olete
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps3+pl+ps+af: 'on'
     olema+V+indic+pres+imps+af: ollakse
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+sg+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+sg+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+sg+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+pl+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+pl+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps3+pl+ps+neg: ole
     olema+V+indic+pres+imps+neg: olda
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+sg+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+sg+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+sg+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps1+pl+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps2+pl+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+ps3+pl+ps+neg: pole
     olema+V+indic+pres+imps+neg: polda
     # indicative mood
     # past tense
     #
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+sg+ps+af: olin
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+sg+ps+af: olid
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+sg+ps+af: oli
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+pl+ps+af: olime
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+pl+ps+af: olite
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+pl+ps+af: olid
     olema+V+indic+impf+imps+af: oldi
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+sg+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+sg+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+sg+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+pl+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+pl+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+pl+ps+neg: olnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+imp+neg: oldud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+sg+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+sg+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+sg+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps1+pl+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps2+pl+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+ps3+pl+ps+neg: polnud
     olema+V+indic+impf+imps+neg: poldud
     # conditional mood
     # present tense
     #
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+sg+af: oleksin
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+sg+af: oleksid
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+sg+af: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+pl+af: oleksime
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+pl+af: oleksite
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+pl+af: oleksid
     olema+V+cond+pres+imps+af: oldaks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+sg+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+sg+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+sg+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+pl+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+pl+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+pl+neg: oleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+imps+neg: oldaks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+sg+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+sg+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+sg+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps1+pl+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps2+pl+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+ps3+pl+neg: poleks
     olema+V+cond+pres+imps+neg: poldaks
     # conditional mood
     # past tense
     #
     olema+V+cond+past+ps1+sg+af: olnuksin
     olema+V+cond+past+ps2+sg+af: olnuksid
     olema+V+cond+past+ps3+sg+af: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps1+pl+af: olnuksime
     olema+V+cond+past+ps2+pl+af: olnuksite
     olema+V+cond+past+ps3+pl+af: olnuksid
     olema+V+cond+past+imps+af: olduks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps1+sg+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps2+sg+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps3+sg+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps1+pl+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps2+pl+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+ps3+pl+neg: olnuks
     olema+V+cond+past+imps+neg: olduks
     # imperative mood
     #
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+sg+af: ole
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+sg+af: olgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps1+pl+af: olgem
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+pl+af: olge
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+pl+af: olgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+imps+af: oldagu
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+sg+neg: ole
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+sg+neg: olgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps1+pl+neg: olgem
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+pl+neg: olge
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+pl+neg: olgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+imps+neg: oldagu
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+sg+neg: pole
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+sg+neg: polgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps1+pl+neg: polgem
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps2+pl+neg: polge
     olema+V+imper+pres+ps3+pl+neg: polgu
     olema+V+imper+pres+imps+neg: poldagu
     # oblique mood (quotative)
     # present tense
     #
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+sg+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+sg+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+sg+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+pl+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+pl+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+pl+af: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+imps+af: oldavat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+sg+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+sg+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+sg+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+pl+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+pl+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+pl+neg: olevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+imps+neg: oldavat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+sg+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+sg+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+sg+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps1+pl+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps2+pl+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+ps3+pl+neg: polevat
     olema+V+quot+pres+imps+neg: poldavat
     # oblique mood (quotative)
     # past tense
     #
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+sg+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+sg+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+sg+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+pl+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+pl+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+pl+af: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+imps+af: oldanuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+sg+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+sg+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+sg+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+pl+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+pl+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+pl+neg: olnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+imps+neg: oldanuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+sg+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+sg+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+sg+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps1+pl+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps2+pl+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+ps3+pl+neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+quot+past+imps+neg: poldanuvat
     # jussive mood
     # present tense
     #
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps1+sg+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps2+sg+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps3+sg+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps1+pl+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps2+pl+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps3+pl+af: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+imps+af: oldagu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps1+sg+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps2+sg+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps3+sg+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps1+pl+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps2+pl+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+ps3+pl+neg: olgu
     olema+V+Jus+Prs+imps+neg: oldagu
     # jussive mood
     # past tense
     #
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+sg+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+sg+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+sg+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+pl+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+pl+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+pl+af: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+imps+af: oldud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+sg+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+sg+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+sg+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+pl+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+pl+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+pl+neg: olnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+imps+neg: oldud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+sg+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+sg+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+sg+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps1+pl+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps2+pl+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+ps3+pl+neg: polnud
     olema+V+Jus+Prt+imps+neg: poldud
     #
     # Infinitive
     #
     olema+V+inf: olla
     #
     # Supine
     #
     olema+V+sup: olema
     olema+V+sup+ill: olema
     olema+V+sup+in: olemas
     olema+V+sup+el: olemast
     olema+V+sup+tr: olemaks
     olema+V+sup+abes: olemata
     olema+V+sup+imps: oldama     
     #
     # Participle
     #
     olema+V+pres+ps: olev
     olema+V+pres+imps+: oldav
     olema+V+past+ps: olnud
     olema+V+past+imps: oldud
     #
     # Gerund
     #
     olema+V+ger: olles


# The verb forms list should be complete now
